New York, session 2025-2026, A5089.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 236 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 236. Active shooter drills. The state police shall conduct an active 4 shooter drill in the state Capitol building and the legislative office 5 building at least once each year in which occupants of the buildings 6 shall participate. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 8 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08496-01-5